Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1421
License; where obtained; prohibited sales.

Licenses for the sale of cigars, tobacco, electronic nicotine delivery systems, cigarettes, and cigarette material to persons twenty-one years of age or over shall be issued to individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies, and corporations by the clerk or finance director of any city or village and by the county clerk of any county upon application duly made as provided in section 28-1422. The sale of cigarettes or cigarette materials that contain perfumes or drugs in any form is prohibited and is not licensed by the provisions of this section. Only cigarettes and cigarette material containing pure white paper and pure tobacco shall be licensed.

Laws 1919, c. 180, § 2, p. 401;

C.S.1922, § 9850;

C.S.1929, § 28-1024;

R.S.1943, § 28-1023;

Laws 1961, c. 128, § 1, p. 379;

R.R.S.1943, § 28-1023, (1975);

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 188;

Laws 2019, LB149, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB1064, § 4.